test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-even-i_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kumppi: # i-stems 
    kumppi+N+Sg+Nom: kumppi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Gen: kuumpi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Acc: kuumpi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Ill: kuumpin
    kumppi+N+Sg+Loc: kuumpist
    kumppi+N+Sg+Com: kumppijn
    kumppi+N+Ess:    kumppin
    kumppi+N+Par:    kumppid
    kumppi+N+Pl+Nom: kuumpih
    kumppi+N+Pl+Gen: kuumpij
    kumppi+N+Pl+Acc: kuumpijd
    kumppi+N+Pl+Ill: kumppijd
    kumppi+N+Pl+Loc: kuumpijn
    kumppi+N+Pl+Com: kumpijguin
    kumppi+N+Pl+Abe: kumpijittáá

  Noun - skappi: # i-stems
    skappi+N+Sg+Nom: skappi
    skappi+N+Sg+Gen: skaapi
    skappi+N+Sg+Acc: skaapi
    skappi+N+Sg+Ill: skaapin
    skappi+N+Sg+Loc: skaapist
    skappi+N+Sg+Com: skappijn
    skappi+N+Sg+Abe: skapittáá
    skappi+N+Ess:    skappin
    skappi+N+Par:    skappid
    skappi+N+Pl+Nom: skaapih
    skappi+N+Pl+Gen: skaapij
    skappi+N+Pl+Acc: skaapijd
    skappi+N+Pl+Ill: skappijd
    skappi+N+Pl+Loc: skaapijn
    skappi+N+Pl+Com: skapijguin
    skappi+N+Pl+Abe: skapijttáá

  Noun - tatti: # i-stems 
    tatti+N+Sg+Nom: tatti
    tatti+N+Sg+Gen: taati
    tatti+N+Sg+Acc: taati
    tatti+N+Sg+Ill: taatin
    tatti+N+Sg+Loc: taatist
    tatti+N+Sg+Com: tattijn
    tatti+N+Ess:    tattin
    tatti+N+Par:    tattid
    tatti+N+Pl+Nom: taatih
    tatti+N+Pl+Gen: taatij
    tatti+N+Pl+Acc: taatijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Ill: tattijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Loc: taatijn
    tatti+N+Pl+Com: tatijguin
    tatti+N+Pl+Abe: tatijttáá
